Utah statutes.
53-3-1004.   Ignition interlock system provider license -- Contents of rules.

In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the commissioner shall make rules regarding the requirements for:

(1)  an ignition interlock system provider license, including requirements concerning:

(a)  locations;

(b)  equipment;

(c)  installers;

(d)  previous records of the provider and installers;

(e)  financial statements;

(f)  schedule of fees and charges;

(g)  character and reputation of the providers and installers;

(h)  insurance as the commissioner determines necessary to protect the interests of the public; and

(i)  other provisions the commissioner may prescribe for the protection of the public;

(2)  an installer's license, including requirements concerning:

(a)  moral character;

(b)  knowledge of the procedures for installation of an ignition interlock system; and

(c)  other provisions the commissioner may prescribe for the protection of the public; and

(3)  applications for licenses.

